Maryland, session 2025, SB0743.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
7–702.
(a) Subject to the provisions of this section, the Administration is liable for its
contracts and torts and for the torts of its officers, agents, and employees in connection with
the performance of the duties and functions of the Administration under this title.
(b) (1) The exclusive remedy for a breach of contract or for a tort committed by
the Administration, its officers, agents, or employees is a suit against the Administration.
(2) No execution may be levied on any property of this State or of the
Administration.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0743*

SENATE BILL 743
(C) THE LIABILITY OF THE ADMINISTRATION AS TO A TORT ACTION MAY
NOT EXCEED $400,000 TO A SINGLE CLAIMANT FOR INJURIES ARISING FROM A
SINGLE INCIDENT OR OCCURRENCE.
[(c)] (D) Subsection [(d)] (E) of this section does not apply to a tort claim that is
asserted by cross–claim, counterclaim, or third–party claim.
[(d)] (E) A tort claimant may not institute an action under this section unless:
(1) The claimant submits a written notice of claim to the Administrator or
the Administrator’s designee within 1 year after the injury to person or property that is the
basis of the claim;
(2) The Administrator or the Administrator’s designee denies the claim;
and
(3) The action is filed within 3 years after the cause of action arises.
[(e)] (F) A notice of claim under this section shall:
(1) Contain a concise statement of facts that sets forth the nature of the
claim, including the date and place of the alleged tort;
(2) State the name and address of the claimant;
(3) State the name, address, and telephone number of counsel for the
claimant, if any; and
(4) Be signed by the claimant, or the legal representative or counsel for the
claimant.
[(f)] (G) A claim under this section is denied:
(1) If the Administrator or the Administrator’s designee sends the
claimant, or the legal representative or counsel for the claimant, written notice of denial;
or
(2) If the Administrator or the Administrator’s designee fails to give notice
of a denial within 6 months after the sending of the notice of claim.
[(g)] (H) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, unless the
Administration affirmatively shows that its defense has been prejudiced by the lack of the
required notice, a court may allow the action to proceed even if the written notice of claim
was not submitted.

SENATE BILL 743 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.